apertium-fra-eng.fra.lexc
LEXICON Adjectives
chaud A1 ; ! ""
beau:be A2 ; ! ""
grand A1 ; ! ""
petit A1 ; ! ""
froid A1 ; ! ""
content A1 ; ! ""
gros A1a ; ! ""
vert A1 ; ! ""
aucun A1 ; ! ""
autre A1a ; ! ""
sûr A1 ; ! ""

LEXICON NUM
%<det%>%<num%>: # ;

LEXICON Numerals 
un NUM ; ! ""
deux NUM ; ! ""
trois NUM ; ! ""
quatre NUM ; ! ""
cinq NUM ; ! ""
six NUM ; ! ""
sept NUM ; ! ""
huit NUM ; ! ""
neuf NUM ; ! ""
dix NUM ; ! ""

1:1 NUM ;
2:2 NUM ;
3:3 NUM ;
4:4 NUM ;
5:5 NUM ;
6:6 NUM ;
7:7 NUM ;
8:8 NUM ;
9:9 NUM ;
1%0:1%0 NUM ;
11:11 NUM ;
12:12 NUM ;
13:13 NUM ;
14:14 NUM ;
15:15 NUM ;
16:16 NUM ;
17:17 NUM ;
18:18 NUM ;
19:19 NUM ;
2%0:2%0 NUM ;
21:21 NUM ;
22:22 NUM ;
23:23 NUM ;
24:24 NUM ;
25:25 NUM ;

LEXICON PP1-SG
%<nom%>:je # ;
%<acc%>:m PRC ;
%<dat%>:m PRC ;
%<disj%>:moi # ;

LEXICON PP1-PL
%<nom%>: # ;
%<acc%>: # ;
%<dat%>: # ;
%<disj%>: # ;

LEXICON PP2-SG
%<nom%>:tu # ;
%<acc%>:t PRC ;
%<dat%>:t PRC ;
%<disj%>:toi # ;

LEXICON PP2-PL
%<nom%>: # ;
%<acc%>: # ;
%<dat%>: # ;
%<disj%>: # ;

LEXICON PP3m
%<sg%>%<nom%>:il # ;
%<sg%>%<acc%>:l PRC ;
%<sg%>%<dat%>:lui # ;
%<sg%>%<disj%>:lui # ;
%<pl%>%<nom%>:ils # ;
%<pl%>%<acc%>:les # ;
%<pl%>%<dat%>:leur # ;
%<pl%>%<eux%>:eux # ;

LEXICON PP3f
%<sg%>%<nom%>:elle # ;
%<sg%>%<acc%>:la # ;
%<sg%>%<dat%>:lui # ;
%<sg%>%<disj%>:elle # ;
%<pl%>%<nom%>:elles # ;
%<pl%>%<acc%>:les # ;
%<pl%>%<dat%>:leur # ;
%<pl%>%<eux%>:elles # ;

LEXICON PRC
%<prc%>:e # ;
%<prc%>: # ;

LEXICON PRONPERS
je%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<sg%>: PP1-SG ; ! ""
nous%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:nous PP1-PL ; ! ""
tu%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<sg%>: PP2-SG ; ! ""
vous%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:vous PP2-PL ; ! ""
il%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<m%>: PP3m ; ! ""
elle%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<f%>: PP3f ; ! ""

LEXICON PRONREFL
je%<prn%>%<refl%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:m PRC ; ! ""
nous%<prn%>%<refl%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:nous # ! ""
tu%<prn%>%<refl%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:t PRC ; ! ""
vous%<prn%>%<refl%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:vous # ! ""
il%<prn%>%<refl%>%<p3%>:s PRC ; ! ""
elle%<prn%>%<refl%>%<p3%>:s PRC ; ! ""

LEXICON PRN
%<prn%>: # ;

LEXICON PRNa
%<prn%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<pl%>:s # ;

LEXICON Pronouns
PRONPERS ;
PRONREFL ;
rien PRN ; ! ""
quelque PRNa ; ! ""
tous PRN ; ! ""
y PRN ; ! ""
cela PRN ; ! ""
ça PRN ; ! ""

LEXICON DET1 ! (un/e)
%<det%>%<indf%>%<m%>: # ;
%<det%>%<indf%>%<f%>:e # ;

LEXICON DET2 ! (ce/tte)
%<det%>%<def%>%<m%>%<sg%>: PRC ;
%<det%>%<def%>%<m%>%<sg%>:et # ;
%<det%>%<def%>%<m%>%<pl%>:es # ;
%<det%>%<def%>%<f%>:ette # ;
%<det%>%<def%>%<f%>%<pl%>:ettes # ;

LEXICON  DET3 ! (le/la)
%<det%>%<def%>%<m%>: PRC ;
%<det%>%<def%>%<f%>:a # ;
%<det%>%<def%>%<pl%>:es # ;

LEXICON POSS-SG
%<m%>:on # ;
%<f%>:a # ;
%<pl%>:es # ;

LEXICON POSS12-PL
%<m%>:otre # ;
%<f%>:otre # ;
%<pl%>:os # ;

LEXICON POSS3-PL
%<m%>: # ;
%<f%>: # ;
%<pl%>:s # ;

LEXICON POSSESSIVES
mon%<det%>%<def%>%<poss%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:m POSS-SG ; ! ""
ton%<det%>%<def%>%<poss%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:t POSS-SG ; ! ""
son%<det%>%<def%>%<poss%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:s POSS-SG ; ! ""
notre%<det%>%<def%>%<poss%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:n POSS12-PL ; ! ""
votre%<det%>%<def%>%<poss%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:v POSS12-PL ; ! ""
leur%<det%>%<def%>%<poss%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:leur POSS3-PL ; ! ""

LEXICON Determiners
POSSESSIVES ;
un DET1 ; ! ""
le:l DET3 ; ! ""
ce:c DET2 ; ! ""

LEXICON ADV
%<adv%>: # ;

LEXICON ADV-OU
0:où ITG ; ! 
0:ou ITG ; !

LEXICON ITG
%<adv%>%<itg%>: # ;

LEXICON Adverbs
aujourd%'hui ADV ; ! ""
hier ADV ; ! ""
où: ADV-OU ; ! ""
très ADV ; ! ""
dehors ADV ; ! ""
pas ADV ; ! ""
toujours ADV ; ! ""
ensemble ADV ; ! ""
aussi ADV ; ! ""
à% présent:à% présent ADV ; ! ""
à% travers:à% travers ADV ; ! ""
non ADV ; ! ""
près ADV ; ! ""
vite ADV ; ! ""
bien ADV ; ! ""
jamais ADV ; ! ""
attentivement ADV ; ! ""
lentement ADV ; ! ""
probablement ADV ; ! ""
partout ADV ; ! ""
maintenant ADV ; ! ""
encore ADV ; ! ""
autour ADV ; ! ""
qui ITG ; ! ""
pourquoi ITG ; ! ""
quand ITG ; ! ""

LEXICON PRE
%<pre%>: # ;

LEXICON PRE-PRC
%<pre%>: PRC ;

LEXICON Prepositions
dans PRE ; ! ""
devant PRE ; ! ""
avec PRE ; ! ""
en PRE ; ! ""
par PRE ; ! ""
vers PRE ; ! "" 
à PRE ; ! ""
de:d PRE-PRC ; ! ""
derrière PRE ; ! ""
sous PRE ; ! ""

LEXICON CNJCOO
%<cnjcoo%>: # ;

LEXICON CNJSUB
%<cnjsub%>: # ;

LEXICON CONJ-PRC
%<cnjcoo%>: PRC ;

LEXICON Conjunctions
mais CNJSUB ; ! ""
et CNJCOO ; ! ""
que:qu CONJ-PRC ; ! ""
lorsque:lorsqu CONJ-PRC ; ! ""
alors CNJCOO ; ! ""
ou CNJCOO ; ! ""

LEXICON PART-PRC
%<part%>: PRC ;

LEXICON Particles
ne:n PART-PRC ; ! ""

LEXICON CONTR
%<contr%>: # ;

LEXICON Contractions
à% le:au CONTR ; ! ""
à% les:aux CONTR ; ! ""

!===================!
 LEXICON Punctuation
!===================!


%.%<sent%>:%. # ;
%.%.%<sent%>:%.%. # ;
%.%.%.%<sent%>:%.%.%. # ;
%;%<sent%>:%; # ;
%:%<sent%>:%: # ;
%!%<sent%>:%! # ;
%-%<guio%>:%- # ;
%—%<guio%>:%— # ;
,%<cm%>:, # ;
%?%<sent%>:%? # ;
%'%<apos%>:%' # ;
%’%<apos%>:%’ # ;
%"%<sent%>:%" # ;
%«%<lquot%>:%« # ;
%»%<rquot%>:%» # ;
%»%<lquot%>:%» # ;
%”%<rquot%>:%” # ;
%”%<lquot%>:%” # ;
%“%<lquot%>:%“ # ;
%(%<lpar%>:%( # ;
%]%<rpar%>:%] # ;
%[%<lpar%>:%[ # ;
%)%<rpar%>:%) # ;
%\%<sent%>:%\ # ;
%/%<sent%>:%/ # ;
